North Carolina, session 2025, HB684.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The General Assembly finds all of the following:
(1) According to American Journal of Public Health studies published in 2014
and 2018 and affirmed by decades of research, Black, Indigenous, and Persons
of Color (BIPOC) and individuals with low income are disproportionately
exposed to environmental hazards and unsafe housing, facing higher levels of
air and water pollution, mold, lead, and pests.
(2) The cumulative impacts of environmental harms disproportionately and
adversely impact the health of BIPOC and communities with low income,
with climate change functioning as a threat multiplier. These disproportionate
adverse impacts are exacerbated by lack of access to affordable energy,
healthy food, green spaces, and other environmental benefits.
(3) Since 1994, Executive Order 12898 has required federal agencies to make
achieving environmental justice part of their mission by identifying and
addressing disproportionately high and adverse human health or
environmental effects of its programs, policies, and activities on minority
populations and populations with low incomes in the United States.
(4) In 2018, the Secretary of the North Carolina Department of Environmental
Quality established the Secretary's Environmental Justice and Advisory
Board.
(5) Executive Order 14008 issued in 2021 created the White House
Environmental Justice Interagency Council within the Executive Office of the
President and the White House Environmental Justice Advisory Council
within the Environmental Protection Agency.
(6) Following Executive Order 14008, the U.S. Department of the Interior enacted
Secretary Order 3399 to establish the Climate Task Force to address current
and historic environmental injustice. This order also made it the Department's
mission to consider environmental justice when conducting National
Environmental Protection Act analyses.
(7) Executive Order 14096 issued in 2023 established a goal that forty percent
(40%) of the overall benefits of certain federal climate, clean energy,
affordable and sustainable housing, and other investments flow to
*H684-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
disadvantaged communities that are marginalized by underinvestment and
overburdened by pollution.
(8) Governor Cooper issued Executive Order 246 in 2022 and Executive Order
292 in 2023 directing various actions to advance environmental justice in
North Carolina, including requirements that agencies consider environmental
justice when taking actions related to climate change, resilience, and clean
energy, and identify an environmental justice lead to serve as the point person
for agency environmental justice efforts.
(9) State agencies receiving federal funds are also subject to the
antidiscrimination requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964.
(10) In response to the documented inadequacy of state and federal environmental
and land use laws to protect vulnerable communities, increasing numbers of
states have adopted formal environmental justice laws and policies.
(11) The 1991 Principles of Environmental Justice adopted by The First National
People of Color Environmental Leadership Summit demand the right of all
individuals to participate as equal partners at every level of decision making,
including needs assessment, planning, implementation, enforcement, and
evaluation.
(12) Section 33 of Article I of the North Carolina Constitution establishes the
government as a vehicle for the common benefit, protection, and security of
the State's citizens and not for the particular emolument or advantage of any
single set of persons who are only a part of that community. This principle,
coupled with Section 1 of Article I of the North Carolina Constitution's
guarantee of equal rights to enjoying life, liberty, and enjoyment of the fruits
of their own labor, and the assurance of timely and equitable justice for all set
forth in Article I. Sections 18 and 19 of the North Carolina Constitution
encourage political officials to identify how particular communities may be
unequally burdened or receive unequal protection under the law due to race,
income, or geographic location.
(13) Lack of a clear environmental justice policy has resulted in a piecemeal
approach to understanding and addressing environmental justice in North
Carolina and creates a barrier to establishing clear definitions, metrics, and
strategies to ensure meaningful engagement and more equitable distribution
of environmental benefits and burdens.
(14) It is the State's responsibility to pursue environmental justice for its residents
and to ensure that its agencies do not contribute to unfair distribution of
environmental benefits to or environmental burdens on low-income,
limited-English proficient, and BIPOC communities.
SECTION 2. Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 21D.
"Environmental Justice.
"§ 143-215.130. Purpose.
The purpose of this Article is to identify, reduce, and eliminate environmental health
disparities to improve the health and well-being of all State residents.
"§ 143-215.131. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Communities of color. – Communities in which the share of nonwhites and
Hispanic or Latino (of any race) residents is forty percent (40%) or higher or
at least ten percent (10%) higher than the residing county or State share.
Page 2 House Bill 684-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Community. – A group of individuals living in geographic proximity to one
another as a census block group or at the municipal level.
(3) Disproportionate impact. – Disproportionately higher adverse health or
environmental effects on communities of color, low-income communities,
limited English language proficiency communities, or indigenous
communities at levels that are statistically significant.
(4) Environmental benefits. – The assets and services that enhance the capability
of communities and individuals to function and flourish in society. Examples
of environmental benefits include access to a healthy environment and clean
natural resources, including air, water, land, green spaces, constructed
playgrounds, and other outdoor recreational facilities and venues; affordable
clean renewable energy sources; public transportation; fulfilling and dignified
green jobs; healthy homes and buildings; health care; nutritious food;
indigenous food and cultural resources; environmental enforcement; and
training and funding disbursed or administered by governmental agencies.
(5) Environmental burdens. – Any significant impact to clean air, water, and land,
including any destruction, damage, or impairment of natural resources
resulting from intentional or reasonably foreseeable causes. Examples of
environmental burdens include climate change impacts; air and water
pollution; improper sewage disposal; improper handling of solid wastes and
other noxious substances; excessive noise; activities that limit access to green
spaces, nutritious food, indigenous food or cultural resources, or constructed
outdoor playgrounds and other recreational facilities and venues; inadequate
remediation of pollution; reduction of groundwater levels; increased flooding
or stormwater flows; home and building health hazards, including lead paint,
lead plumbing, asbestos, and mold; and damage to inland waterways and
waterbodies, wetlands, forests, green spaces, or constructed playgrounds or
other outdoor recreational facilities and venues from private, industrial,
commercial, and government operations or other activities that contaminate
or alter the quality of the environment and pose a risk to public health.
(6) Environmental justice. – The just treatment and meaningful involvement of
all people, regardless of income, race, color, national origin, tribal affiliation,
or English language proficiency, in State action that affect human health,
well-being, quality of life, and the environment so that people:
a. Are protected from disproportionate and adverse human health effects
and environmental hazards, including: those related to climate change,
the cumulative impacts of environmental and other burdens, and the
legacy of racism or other structural barriers.
b. Have equitable access to environmental benefits in which to live, play,
work, learn, grow, worship, and engage in cultural and subsistence
practices.
c. Have meaningful participation in decision-making processes,
including the development, implementation, and enforcement of
environmental laws, regulations, and policies.
(7) Environmental justice communities. – Communities of color, low-income
communities, indigenous communities, and limited English language
proficiency communities that experience, or are at risk of, environmental
burdens or lack access to environmental benefits.
(8) Indigenous communities. – Communities where "American Indian Tribes" as
defined by 01 NCAC 15. 0292, reside or where the share of American and
House Bill 684-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Alaskan Native populations are five percent (5%) higher than the residing
county or State share.
(9) Limited English language proficiency communities. – Communities where at
least one percent (1%) or more of households do not have a member 14 years
or older who speaks English "very well" as defined by the U.S. Census
Bureau.
(10) Low-income communities. – Communities in which the share of population
experiencing poverty is more than twenty percent (20%) or the share of
households in poverty is at least five percent (5%) higher than the residing
county or State share.
(11) Meaningful participation. – The opportunity for all individuals to participate
in energy, climate change, and environmental decision making. Examples
include needs assessments, planning, implementation, permitting, compliance
and enforcement, and evaluation. Meaningful participation also integrates
diverse knowledge systems, histories, traditions, languages, and cultures of
Indigenous communities in decision-making processes and requires that
communities are enabled and administratively assisted to participate fully
through education and training. Finally, meaningful participation requires the
State to operate in a transparent manner with regard to opportunities for
community input and also encourages the development of environmental,
energy, and climate change stewardship.
(12) Program. – The Environmental Justice Program of the Department of
Environmental Quality.
(13) Rules Review Commission. – As defined in G.S. 143B-30.1.
"§ 143-215.132. Environmental justice State policy.
It is the policy of the State that no segment of the population of the State should, because of
its racial, cultural, or economic makeup, bear a disproportionate share of environmental burdens
or be denied an equitable share of environmental benefits. It is further the policy of the State to
provide the opportunity for the meaningful participation of all individuals, with particular
attention to environmental justice communities, in the development, implementation, or
enforcement of any law, regulation, or policy.
"§ 143-215.133. Implementation of State policy.
(a) As used in this Article, "covered agencies" means the following State agencies: the
Departments of Environmental Quality, Health and Human Services, Transportation, Commerce,
Public Safety, Agriculture and Consumer Services, and Public Instruction and the Utilities
Commission.
(b) The covered agencies shall consider cumulative environmental burdens and access to
environmental benefits when making decisions about the environment, energy, climate, and
public health projects; facilities and infrastructure; and associated funding.
(c) Each of the covered agencies shall create and adopt on or before July 1, 2027, a
community engagement plan that describes how the agency will engage with environmental
justice communities as it evaluates new and existing activities and programs. Each plan shall
describe how the agency plans to provide meaningful participation in compliance with Title VI
of the Civil Rights Act of 1964.
(d) The covered agencies shall submit an annual summary beginning on January 15,
2026, and annually thereafter, to the Environmental Justice Advisory Council, detailing all
complaints alleging environmental justice issues or Title VI violations and any agency action
taken to resolve the complaints. The Advisory Council shall provide any recommendations
concerning those reports within 60 days after receipt of the complaint summaries. Agencies shall
consider the recommendations of the Advisory Council pursuant to sub-subdivision (c)(1)e. of
Page 4 House Bill 684-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
G.S. 143-215.135 and substantively respond in writing if an agency chooses not to implement
any of the recommendations within 90 days after receipt of the recommendations.
(e) The Program, in consultation with the Environmental Justice Advisory Council and
the Interagency Environmental Justice Committee, shall review the definitions contained in
G.S. 143-215.131 at least every five years and recommend revisions to the General Assembly to
ensure the definition achieves the environmental justice State policy.
(f) The Program, in consultation with the Interagency Environmental Justice Committee
and the Environmental Justice Advisory Council, shall issue guidance on how the covered
agencies shall determine which investments provide environmental benefits to environmental
justice communities on or before September 15, 2025. A draft version of the guidance shall be
released for a 40-day public comment period before being finalized.
(g) Covered Agency Baseline Spending Reports. –
(1) On or before February 15, 2026, the covered agencies shall, in accordance
with the guidance document developed by the Program pursuant to subsection
(f) of this section, review the past three years and generate baseline spending
reports that include all of the following:
a. Where investments were made, if any, and which geographic areas, at
the municipal or census block group level, where practicable, received
environmental benefits from those investments.
b. A description and quantification of the environmental benefits as an
outcome of the investment.
(2) The covered agencies shall publicly post the baseline spending reports on their
respective websites.
(h) On or before July 1, 2026, it shall be the goal of the covered agencies to direct
investments proportionately in environmental justice communities.
(1) Beginning on January 15, 2028, and annually thereafter, the covered agencies
shall either integrate the following information into existing annual spending
reports or issue annual spending reports that include all of the following:
a. Where investments were made and which geographic areas, at the
municipal and census block group level, where practicable, received
environmental benefits from those investments.
b. The percentage of overall environmental benefits from those
investments provided to environmental justice communities.
(2) The covered agencies shall publicly post the annual spending reports on their
respective websites.
(i) Beginning on January 15, 2027, the covered agencies shall each issue and publicly
post an annual report summarizing all actions taken to incorporate environmental justice into its
policies or determinations, rulemaking, permit proceedings, or project review.
"§ 143-215.134. Rulemaking.
(a) On or before July 1, 2027, the Department of Environmental Quality, in consultation
with the Environmental Justice Advisory Council and the Interagency Environmental Justice
Committee, shall adopt rules to:
(1) Define cumulative environmental burdens;
(2) Implement consideration of cumulative environmental burdens within the
Program; and
(3) Inform how the public and the covered agencies implement the consideration
of cumulative environmental burdens and use the environmental justice
mapping tool developed by the Program.
(b) On or before July 1, 2028, and as appropriate thereafter, the covered agencies, in
consultation with the Environmental Justice Advisory Council, shall adopt or amend policies and
procedures, plans, guidance, and rules, where applicable, to implement this Article.
House Bill 684-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) The following requirements apply to rulemaking by covered agencies:
(1) Prior to drafting new rules required by this Article, agencies shall consult with
the Environmental Justice Advisory Council to discuss the scope and
proposed content of rules to be developed. Agencies shall also submit draft
rulemaking concepts to the Advisory Council for review and comment. Any
proposed rule shall be provided to the Advisory Council not less than 45 days
prior to submitting the proposed rule or rules to the Rules Review Commission
(RRC).
(2) The Advisory Council shall vote and record individual members' support or
objection to any proposed rule before it is submitted to RRC and make
documentation of that proceeding as part of the rulemaking record submitted
to RRC.
"§ 143-215.135. Environmental Justice Advisory Council and Interagency Environmental
Justice Committee.
(a) Advisory Council and Interagency Committee. –
(1) There is created:
a. The Environmental Justice Advisory Council (Advisory Council) to
provide independent advice and recommendations to State agencies
and the General Assembly on matters relating to environmental
justice, including the integration of environmental justice principles
into State programs, policies, regulations, legislation, and activities.
b. The Interagency Environmental Justice Committee (Interagency
Committee) to guide and coordinate State agency implementation of
the Environmental Justice State Policy and provide recommendations
to the General Assembly for amending the definitions and protections
set forth in this Article.
(2) Appointments to the groups created in this subsection shall be made on or
before December 15, 2025.
(3) Both the Advisory Council and the Interagency Committee shall consider and
incorporate the Equitable Access & Just Transition to Clean Energy
provisions of the North Carolina Clean Energy Plan in their work.
(b) Meetings. – The Advisory Council and the Interagency Committee shall each meet
not more than eight times per year, with at least four meetings occurring jointly. Meetings may
be held in person, remotely, or in a hybrid format to facilitate maximum participation and shall
be recorded and publicly posted on the Secretary's website.
(c) Duties. –
(1) The Advisory Council shall have the following duties:
a. To advise State agencies on environmental justice issues and on how
to incorporate environmental justice into agency procedures and
decision making and evaluate the potential for environmental burdens
or disproportionate impacts on environmental justice communities as
a result of State actions and the potential for environmental benefits to
environmental justice communities.
b. To advise State agencies in the development of community
engagement plans.
c. To advise State agencies on the use of the environmental justice
mapping tool established by the Program and on the enhancement of
meaningful participation, reduction of environmental burdens, and
equitable distribution of environmental benefits.
Page 6 House Bill 684-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. To review and provide feedback to the relevant State agency, pursuant
to G.S. 143-215.134(c), on any proposed rules for implementing this
Article.
e. To receive and review annual State agency summaries of complaints
alleging environmental justice issues, including Title VI complaints,
and suggest options or alternatives to State agencies for the resolution
of systemic issues raised in or by the complaints.
(2) The Interagency Committee shall have the following duties:
a. To consult with the Program in the development of the guidance
document required by G.S. 143-215.133(f) on how to determine which
investments provide environmental benefits to environmental justice
communities.
b. On or before July 1, 2025, to develop, in consultation with the Program
and the Environmental Justice Advisory Council, a set of core
principles to guide and coordinate the development of the State agency
community engagement plans required under G.S 143-215.133(c).
(3) The Advisory Council and the Interagency Committee shall jointly:
a. Consider and recommend to the General Assembly, on or before
December 1, 2026, amendments to the terminology, thresholds, and
criteria of the definition of environmental justice communities,
including whether to include populations more likely to be at higher
risk for poor health outcomes in response to environmental burdens.
b. Examine existing data and studies on environmental justice and
consult with State, federal, and local agencies and affected
communities regarding the impact of current statutes, regulations, and
policies on the achievement of environmental justice.
(d) Membership. –
(1) Advisory Council. – Each member of the Advisory Council shall be well
informed regarding environmental justice principles and committed to
achieving environmental justice in North Carolina and working
collaboratively with other members of the Advisory Council. To the greatest
extent practicable, Advisory Council members shall represent diversity in
race, ethnicity, age, gender, urban and rural areas, and different regions of
the State. The Advisory Council shall consist of the following 11 members,
with a goal to have more than fifty percent (50%) residing in environmental
justice communities:
a. The head of the Program or designee.
b. The following members appointed by the Governor:
1. One representative of municipal government.
2. One representative of a social justice organization.
3. One representative of mobile home park residents.
4. One representative of a statewide environmental organization.
5. One person representing an organization working on food
security issues.
c. One person who resides in a census block group that is designated as
an environmental justice community by the House of Representatives
upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of
Representatives.
d. One person who is a representative of immigrant communities in
North Carolina appointed by the Senate upon the recommendation of
the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
House Bill 684-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
e. One representative of a State-recognized Native American Indian
tribe, recommended and appointed by the North Carolina Indian
Affairs Commission.
f. The Executive Director of the North Carolina Housing Finance
Agency or designee.
g. The Executive Director of the North Carolina Land and Water Fund
or designee.
(2) Interagency Committee. – The Interagency Committee shall consist of the
following nine members:
a. The Superintendent of Public Instruction or designee.
b. The Secretary of the Department of Environmental Quality or
designee.
c. The Secretary of Transportation or designee.
d. The Director of the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency or
designee.
e. The Commissioner of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer
Services or designee.
f. The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services or
designee.
g. The Director of the Division of Emergency Management of the
Department of Public Safety or designee.
h. The Secretary of the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources or
designee.
i. The Chair of the Utilities Commission or designee.
(3) The Advisory Council and the Interagency Committee may each elect two
cochairs.
(4) After initial appointments, all appointed members of the Advisory Council
shall serve six-year terms and serve until a successor is appointed. The initial
terms shall be staggered so that one-third of the appointed members shall serve
a two-year term, another third of the appointed members shall serve a
four-year term, and the remaining members shall be appointed to a six-year
term.
(5) Vacancies of the Advisory Council shall be appointed in the same manner as
original appointments.
(6) The Advisory Council shall have the administrative, technical, and legal
assistance of the Program."
SECTION 3. Reports. – On or before December 15, 2027, the Program shall submit
a report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and the Fiscal
Research Division of the General Assembly describing whether the baseline spending reports
completed pursuant to G.S. 143-215.133(g), as enacted by Section 2 of this act, indicate if any
municipalities or portions of municipalities are routinely underserved with respect to
environmental benefits, taking into consideration whether those areas receive, averaged across
three years, a significantly lower percentage of environmental benefits from State investments as
compared to other municipalities or portions of municipalities in the State. This report shall
include a recommendation as to whether a statutory definition of "underserved community" and
any other revisions to Article 21D of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, as enacted by Section
2 of this act, are necessary to best carry out the policies described in this act.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 8 House Bill 684-First Edition